Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-19,140
Appeal from denial of reinstatement.

(a) The Secretary of State, upon denying a corporation's application for reinstatement following administrative dissolution, shall serve the corporation under section 21-1937 with a written notice that explains the reason or reasons for denial.

(b) The corporation may appeal the denial of reinstatement to the district court of Lancaster County within ninety days after service of the notice of denial is perfected. The corporation appeals by petitioning the district court to set aside the dissolution and attaching to the petition copies of the Secretary of State's certificate of dissolution, the corporation's application for reinstatement, and the Secretary of State's notice of denial.

(c) The district court may summarily order the Secretary of State to reinstate the dissolved corporation or may take other action the court considers appropriate.

(d) The district court's final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 140.